District of Columbia statutes.
47-4510

Seizure of accounts prohibited.

A person may not attach, execute, garnish, or otherwise seize a current or future benefit under a higher education tuition savings account or an asset of the Program.

Mar. 31, 2001, D.C. Law 13-212, § 2(b), 47 DCR 9457